Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.270

Metropolitan transit commission.

(1) If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan transportation with a commission form of management, a metropolitan transit commission shall be formed prior to the effective date of the assumption of such function. Except as provided in this section, the metropolitan transit commission shall exercise all powers of the metropolitan municipal corporation with respect to metropolitan transportation facilities, including but not limited to the power to construct, acquire, maintain, operate, extend, alter, repair, control and manage a local public transportation system within and without the metropolitan area, to establish new passenger transportation services and to alter, curtail, or abolish any services as the commission may deem desirable and to fix tolls and fares.

(2) The comprehensive plan for public transportation service and any amendments thereof shall be adopted by the metropolitan council and the metropolitan transit commission shall provide transportation facilities and service consistent with such plan. The metropolitan transit commission shall authorize expenditures for transportation purposes within the budget adopted by the metropolitan council. Tolls and fares may be fixed or altered by the commission only after approval thereof by the metropolitan council. Bonds of the metropolitan municipal corporation for public transportation purposes shall be issued by the metropolitan council as provided in this chapter.

(3) The metropolitan transit commission shall consist of seven members. Six of such members shall be appointed by the metropolitan council and the seventh member shall be the chair of the metropolitan council who shall be ex officio the chair of the metropolitan transit commission. Three of the six appointed members of the commission shall be residents of the central city and three shall be residents of the metropolitan area outside of the central city. The three central city members of the first metropolitan transit commission shall be selected from the existing transit commission of the central city, if there be a transit commission in such city. The terms of first appointees shall be for one, two, three, four, five and six years, respectively. Thereafter, commissioners shall serve for a term of four years. Compensation of transit commissioners shall be determined by the metropolitan council.

(4) There is one nonvoting member of the metropolitan transit commission. The nonvoting member is recommended by the labor organization representing the public transportation employees within the local public transportation system. If the public transportation employees are represented by more than one labor organization, all such labor organizations shall select the nonvoting member by majority vote. The nonvoting member is appointed for a term of four years. The nonvoting member shall comply with all governing bylaws and policies of the commission. The chair or cochairs of the commission shall exclude the nonvoting member from attending any executive session held for the purpose of discussing negotiations with labor organizations. The chair or cochairs may exclude the nonvoting member from attending any other executive session.

(5) The requirement to create a metropolitan transit commission shall not apply to a county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW.

[ 2010 c 278 s 1; 2009 c 549 s 2106; 1993 c 240 s 6; 1967 c 105 s 12; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.270. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 27.]